Massachusetts, session 194th, S3165.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding section 58A of chapter 31 of the General Laws or any
other general or special law to the contrary, the Town of Holbrook may appoint Patrick Doherty
as a firefighter in the Holbrook Fire Department, provided that he satisfies all other requirements
for appointment as determined by the Town of Holbrook, the Human Resources Division, the
Civil Service Commission, and any other applicable authority.
SECTION 2. Except as otherwise provided herein, Patrick Doherty shall be subject to all
laws, rules, regulations, policies, procedures, qualifications and standards applicable to
firefighters employed by the Town of Holbrook.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1